Washington statutes.
RCW 42.30.900

Short title.

This chapter may be known and cited as the Washington state open public meetings act or OPMA.

[ 2022 c 115 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 115: See note following RCW 42.30.230.